irish.lexc
!!! irish.lexc !!!

Multichar_Symbols +V +Past +Pres +Fut +Cond +PastImpf +Imprt +Sbjnct +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl +Aut

LEXICON Root

Verb ;

LEXICON Verb

!! Suppletive Verbs (w/ exceptions) !!
!bí		Vwk2; !ok
!déan	Vwk1; !ok
!tar	Vwk1; !ok
!tabhair Vwk1; !ok
!abair	Vwk1; !ok
!téigh	Vwk1; !ok
!feic	Vwk1; !ok
!faigh	Vwk1; !ok
!ith	Vwk1; !ok
!beir	Vwk1; !ok
!clois	Vwk1; !ok

!! Vwk1 !!
cuir	Vwk1; !ok
!mór	Vwk1; !ok
!maith	Vwk1; !ok
!fear	Vwk1; !ok
!alt	Vwk1; !ok
!caith	Vwk1; !ok
!bain	Vwk1; !ok
!féad	Vwk1; !ok
!dóigh	Vwk1; !ok
!teacht	Vwk1; !ok

!úsáid	Vwk1; !ok
!fág	Vwk1; !ok
!measc	Vwk1; !ok
!rith	Vwk1; !ok
!roinn	Vwk1; !ok
!dath	Vwk1; !ok
!lean	Vwk1; !ok
!meas	Vwk1; !ok
!tuig	Vwk1; !ok
!scríobh Vwk1; !ok

!tóg	Vwk1; !ok
!buail	Vwk1; !ok
!féach	Vwk1; !ok
!glac	Vwk1; !ok
!leigheas Vwk1; !ok
!cas	Vwk1; !ok
!ceap	Vwk1; !ok
!clog	Vwk1; !ok
!síl	Vwk1; !ok
!fás	Vwk1; !ok

!iarr	Vwk1; !ok
!íoc	Vwk1; !ok
!saor	Vwk1; !ok
!barr	Vwk1; !ok
!seol	Vwk1; !ok
!tit	Vwk1; !ok

!! Vwk2 !!
!éirigh	Vwk2; !ok
!tarlaigh Vwk2; !ok
!labhair Vwk2; !ok
!léirigh Vwk2; !ok
!imigh	Vwk2; !ok
!inis	Vwk2; !ok
!foilsigh Vwk2; !ok
!lorg	Vwk2; !ok
!foghlaim Vwk2; !ok

!!!!

LEXICON Vwk1

+V:0						#;
+V+Past:0					Vwk1Past;
+V+Pres:0					Vwk1Pres;
+V+Fut:0					Vwk1Fut;
+V+Cond:+Len+PrefixD		Vwk1Cond;
+V+PastImpf:+Len+PrefixD	Vwk1PastImpf;
+V+Imprt:0					Vwk1Imprt;
+V+Sbjnct:+Ecl				Vwk1Sbjnct;

LEXICON Vwk1Past

+1P+Sg:+Len+PrefixD		#;
+2P+Sg:+Len+PrefixD		#;
+3P+Sg:+Len+PrefixD		#;
+1P+Pl:+Len+PrefixD^amar #;
+2P+Pl:+Len+PrefixD		#;
+3P+Pl:+Len+PrefixD^adar #;
+Aut:^adh				#;

LEXICON Vwk1Pres

+1P+Sg:^im		#;
+2P+Sg:^ann		#;
+3P+Sg:^ann		#;
+1P+Pl:^imid	#;
+2P+Pl:^ann		#;
+3P+Pl:^ann		#;
+Aut:^tar		#;

LEXICON Vwk1Fut

+1P+Sg:^fidh	#;
+2P+Sg:^fidh	#;
+3P+Sg:^fidh	#;
+1P+Pl:^fimid	#;
+2P+Pl:^fidh	#;
+3P+Pl:^fidh	#;
+Aut:^far		#;

LEXICON Vwk1Cond

+1P+Sg:^finn	#;
+2P+Sg:^fá		#;
+3P+Sg:^fadh	#;
+1P+Pl:^fimis	#;
+2P+Pl:^fadh	#;
+3P+Pl:^fidís	#;
+Aut:^fí		#;

LEXICON Vwk1PastImpf

+1P+Sg:^inn		#;
+2P+Sg:^tá		#;
+3P+Sg:^adh		#;
+1P+Pl:^imis	#;
+2P+Pl:^adh		#;
+3P+Pl:^idís	#;
+Aut:^tí		#;

LEXICON Vwk1Imprt

+1P+Sg:^im		#;
+2P+Sg:0		#;
+3P+Sg:^adh		#;
+1P+Pl:^imis	#;
+2P+Pl:^igí		#;
+3P+Pl:^idís	#;
+Aut:^tar		#;

LEXICON Vwk1Sbjnct

+1P+Sg:^A		#;
+2P+Sg:^A		#;
+3P+Sg:^A		#;
+1P+Pl:^imid	#;
+2P+Pl:^A		#;
+3P+Pl:^A		#;
+Aut:^tar		#;

!!!!

LEXICON Vwk2

+V:0						#;
+V+Past:0					Vwk2Past;
+V+Pres:0					Vwk2Pres;
+V+Fut:0					Vwk2Fut;
+V+Cond:+Len+PrefixD		Vwk2Cond;
+V+PastImpf:+Len+PrefixD	Vwk2PastImpf;
+V+Imprt:0					Vwk2Imprt;
+V+Sbjnct:+Ecl				Vwk2Sbjnct;

LEXICON Vwk2Past

+1P+Sg:+Len+PrefixD			#;
+2P+Sg:+Len+PrefixD			#;
+3P+Sg:+Len+PrefixD			#;
+1P+Pl:+Len+PrefixD^íomar 	#;
+2P+Pl:+Len+PrefixD			#;
+3P+Pl:+Len+PrefixD^íodar 	#;
+Aut:^íodh					#;

LEXICON Vwk2Pres

+1P+Sg:^ím		#;
+2P+Sg:^íonn	#;
+3P+Sg:^íonn	#;
+1P+Pl:^ímid	#;
+2P+Pl:^íonn	#;
+3P+Pl:^íonn	#;
+Aut:^ítear		#;

LEXICON Vwk2Fut

+1P+Sg:^óidh	#;
+2P+Sg:^óidh	#;
+3P+Sg:^óidh	#;
+1P+Pl:^óimid	#;
+2P+Pl:^óidh	#;
+3P+Pl:^óidh	#;
+Aut:^ófar		#;

LEXICON Vwk2Cond

+1P+Sg:^óinn	#;
+2P+Sg:^ófá		#;
+3P+Sg:^ódh		#;
+1P+Pl:^óimis	#;
+2P+Pl:^ódh		#;
+3P+Pl:^óidís	#;
+Aut:^ófaí		#;

LEXICON Vwk2PastImpf

+1P+Sg:^ínn		#;
+2P+Sg:^íteá	#;
+3P+Sg:^íodh	#;
+1P+Pl:^ímis	#;
+2P+Pl:^íodh	#;
+3P+Pl:^ídís	#;
+Aut:^ítí		#;

LEXICON Vwk2Imprt

+1P+Sg:^ím		#;
+2P+Sg:0		#;
+3P+Sg:^íodh	#;
+1P+Pl:^ímis	#;
+2P+Pl:^ígí		#;
+3P+Pl:^ídís	#;
+Aut:^ítear		#;

LEXICON Vwk2Sbjnct

+1P+Sg:^í		#;
+2P+Sg:^í		#;
+3P+Sg:^í		#;
+1P+Pl:^ímid	#;
+2P+Pl:^í		#;
+3P+Pl:^í		#;
+Aut:^ítear		#;
